Utah statutes.
75-5b-206.   Jurisdiction declined by reason of conduct.
(1)  If at any time a court of this state determines that it acquired
jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order because of
unjustifiable conduct, the court may:
(a)  decline to exercise jurisdiction;
(b)  exercise jurisdiction for the limited purpose of fashioning an
appropriate remedy to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the respondent
or the protection of the respondent's property or prevent a repetition of the
unjustifiable conduct, including staying the proceeding until a petition for
the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is filed in a
court of another state having jurisdiction; or
(c)  continue to exercise jurisdiction after considering:
(i)  the extent to which the respondent and all persons required to be
notified of the proceedings have acquiesced in the exercise of the court's
jurisdiction;
(ii)  whether it is a more appropriate forum than the court of any other state
under the factors set forth in Subsection 75-5b-205(3); and
(iii)  whether the court of any other state would have jurisdiction under
factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional
standards of Section 75-5b-202.
(2)  If a court of this state determines that it acquired jurisdiction to
appoint a guardian or issue a protective order because a party seeking to
invoke its jurisdiction engaged in unjustifiable conduct, it may assess
against that party necessary and reasonable expenses, including attorney fees,
investigative fees, court costs, communication expenses, witness fees and
expenses, and travel expenses.  The court may not assess fees, costs, or
expenses of any kind against the state or a governmental subdivision, agency,
or instrumentality of the state unless authorized by law other than this
chapter.
